test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mansoTS_gt-norm.yaml
# NB! Following stem-final modifications take place in AccPl stem: ва -> би, ка -> ци, га -> зи
# #+Use/SpellNoSugg
  Noun - манˮ: # Noun 'bush /(fin) pensas' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi s+o/
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom: манˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc: манасмʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen: манасʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat: манатʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc: манкана
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl: манкад
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros: манˮмана
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom: манакʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc: манакʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen: манакʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom: манасˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc: мансо
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen: мансоˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat: манакˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc: манкаˮна
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl: манкат
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros: мансоˮмна
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [манаˮм, манˮми]
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [манаˮам, манˮми] # This in theory should equal +Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: манˮми #+Use/SpellNoSugg
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [манаˮм, манˮми]
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [манаˮам, манˮми] # This in theory should equal +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: манˮми #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [манаˮн, манˮни]
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: манˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [манкан, манкани]
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: манкани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [манканан,  манканани]
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: манканани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [манкадан, манкадани, манкадни]
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [манкадани, манкадни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [манˮманан, манˮманани]
#     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: манˮманани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [манкаюн, манкаюни]
#     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: манкаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [манкаюн, манкаюни]
#     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: манкаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [манкаюн, манкаюни]
#     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: манкаюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [мансон, мансони]
#     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мансони #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [мансон, мансони]
#     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: мансони #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [мансоˮн, мансоˮни]
#     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: мансоˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [манкаˮн, манкаˮни]
#     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: манкаˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [манкаˮнан, манкаˮнани]
#     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: манкаˮнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [манкатан, манкатани, манкатни]
#     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [манкатани, манкатни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [мансоˮмнан, мансоˮмнани]
#     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: мансоˮмнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: манаˮал
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: манат
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: манат
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: манканд
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: манкананд
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: манкаданд
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: манˮмананд
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: манкаюд
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: манкаюд
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: манкают
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: мансод
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: мансод
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: мансот
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: манкат
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: манкаˮнат
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: манкатат
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: мансоˮмнат
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: манта
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: манта
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: манта
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: манканда
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: манкананда
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: манкаданда
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: манˮмананда
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: манкаюда
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: манкаюда
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: манкаюта
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: мансода
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: мансода
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: мансота
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: манката
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: манкаˮната
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [манкатата, манкатта]
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: мансоˮмната
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: манˮмиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: манˮмиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: манˮниʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: манканиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: манкананиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [манкаданиʼ, манкадниʼ]
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: манˮмананиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: манкаюниʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: манкаюниʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: манкаюниʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: мансониʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: мансониʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: мансоˮниʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: манкаˮниʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: манкаˮнаниʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [манкатаниʼ, манкатниʼ]
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: мансоˮмнаниʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: манˮлиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: мантиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: мантиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: манкандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: манканандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: манкадандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: манˮманандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: манкаюдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: манкаюдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: манкаютиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: мансодиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: мансодиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: мансотиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: манкатиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: манкаˮнатиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [манкататиʼ, манкаттиʼ]
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: мансоˮмнатиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: мантиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: мантиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: мантиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: манкандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: манканандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: манкадандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: манˮманандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: манкаюдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: манкаюдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: манкаютиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: мансодиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: мансодиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: мансотиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: манкатиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: манкаˮнатиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [манкататиʼ, манкаттиʼ]
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: мансоˮмнатиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: манˮмаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: манˮмаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: манˮнаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: манканаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: манкананаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [манкаданаˮ, манкаднаˮ]
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: манˮмананаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: манкаюнаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: манкаюнаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: манкаюнаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мансонаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мансонаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: мансоˮнаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: манкаˮнаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: манкаˮнанаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [манкатанаˮ, манкатнаˮ]
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: мансоˮмнанаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: манˮлаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: мантаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: мантаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: манкандаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: манканандаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: манкадандаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: манˮманандаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: манкаюдаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: манкаюдаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: манкаютаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мансодаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мансодаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мансотаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: манкатаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: манкаˮнатаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [манкататаˮ, манкаттаˮ]
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: мансоˮмнатаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: мантоʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: мантоʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: мантоʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: манкандоʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: манканандоʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: манкадандоʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: манˮманандоʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: манкаюдоʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: манкаюдоʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: манкаютоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мансодоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мансодоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мансотоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: манкатоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: манкаˮнатоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [манкататоʼ, манкаттоʼ]
     манˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: мансоˮмнатоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Abs: манат
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [мантав, мантув, мантами]
#     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: мантами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [мантав, мантув, мантами]
#     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: мантами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [мантан, мантани]
#     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: мантани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: мантар
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: мантамд
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: мантанд
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: мантада
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: мантамда
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: мантанда
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: мантамиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: мантамиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: мантаниʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: мантариʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: мантамдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: мантандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: мантадиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: мантамдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: мантандиʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: мантаваˮ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: мантаваˮ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: мантанаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: мантараˮ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: мантамдаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: мантандаˮ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: мантадоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: мантамдоʼ
     манˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: мантандоʼ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: манатмʼ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: манат
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манˮ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: манˮниʼ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: мантиʼ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манакʼ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: манˮмаˮ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: мантаˮ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: манасˮ
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: мантамзь
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: мантась
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манаць
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: манˮнинзь
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: мантинзь
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манканзь
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: манˮмаць
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: мантаць
     манˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: мансаць
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манаˮам
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манаˮал
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манта
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манˮмиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манˮлиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мантиʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манˮмаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: манˮлаˮ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: мантоʼ
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манˮмась
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манˮлась
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мантась
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манˮминзь
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манˮлинзь
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мантинзь
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манˮмаць
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: манˮлаць
     манˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: мантонзь
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюн
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюд
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюда
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюниʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюдиʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюнаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюдаˮ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: манкаюдоʼ
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюнась
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюдась
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюдась
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюнинзь
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюдинзь
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюдинзь
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюнаць
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюдаць
     манˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: манкаюдонзь
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансон
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансод
     манˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: мансода
